Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1177.
do enact as follows:AB1177,11Section 1. 196.03 (7) of the statutes is created to read:AB1177,2,32196.03 (7) (a) In this subsection, “electric utility” means a public utility that 3provides retail electric service to customers in this state.AB1177,2,74(b) Beginning on the date that an electric utility files a general rate case 5application with the commission and continuing until 60 days after the conclusion 6of the rate case, an electric utility shall provide to each customer a notice that 7includes all of the following information:AB1177,2,881. That the electric utility has requested that the commission change its rates.AB1177,2,1092. The anticipated dollar and percentage effect of the proposed or ordered rate 10changes on the average residential and commercial customer bill.AB1177,2,12113. That copies of the electric utility’s application are available for inspection at 12all offices of the electric utility and on the electric utility’s website.AB1177,2,14134. That an explanation of the proposed or ordered changes to the electric 14utility’s rates is available from the electric utility upon request.AB1177,2,1715(c) The information provided in the notice under par. (b) shall initially 16describe the electric utility’s rate case application and, after the commission issues 17the final rate case order, the information in the notice shall describe the order.AB1177,2,2018(d) An electric utility shall provide the notice required under par. (b) on its 19website and through a publication that is transmitted to each of its customers by 20the transmission method used to provide the customer’s bill.AB1177,221Section 2. Initial applicability.AB1177,2,2322(1) This act first applies to a general rate case application filed by an electric 23utility on the effective date of this subsection.AB1177,2,2424